src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON BÅETEDH_TV_ePRET  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                     +V+TV:               BÅETEDH  ;
 +V+TV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>             VSUF-PRT ;
  +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv  SOVVEDH  ;
!   +V+TV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML    VÅÅJNEDH ;
     +V+TV+Der1+Der/htalle:%»%^1UMLahtall SOVVEDH  ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs
      +V+TV+Der1+Der/lg:%»%^1UMLalg    LGIDH    ; !Passive, only from transitive verbs

LEXICON BÅETEDH_IV  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                     +V+IV:              BÅETEDH      ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>%^iUML      VSUF-PRT     ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!       +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML   IV_PASSIVE_S ;

LEXICON BÅETEDH_IV_ePRET  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                     +V+IV:              BÅETEDH      ;
 +V+IV+Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>            VSUF-PRT     ;
  +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassL+Uml:%»%^1UMLasovv IV_PASSIVE_L ;
!       +V+IV+Der3+Der/PassS+Uml:%»%^PASSUML   IV_PASSIVE_S ;


LEXICON BÅETEDH   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group I
                     +Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa         V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
                         +Ind+Prs:%>ie              VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
                  +Ind+Prt+Dial/L:%>iej             VSUF-ODD-PRT       ;
                           +Imprt:%>                VSUF-EVEN-IMP      ;
            +Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>ibie            FINAL1             ;
            +Ind+Prt+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>idie            FINAL1             ;
            +Ind+Prt+Du2+Err/Orth:%>idien           FINAL1             ;


! Infinite forms
! --------------
                             +Inf:%>edh             FINAL1             ;
                            +VGen:%>ien             FINAL1             ;
                          +ConNeg:%>ieh             FINAL1             ;
!                            +Act:%>eme             FINAL1             ;
                             +Ger:%>ieminie         FINAL1             ;
                    +Ger+Err/Orth:%>eminie          FINAL1             ;
                          +PrsPrc:%>ije             flagFINAL1         ;
                 +PrsPrc+Err/Orth:%>eje             flagFINAL1         ;
!                         +PrsPrc:%>ijes            FINAL1             ;
                      +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
                +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej             flagIJE_ODD        ;
       +Der3+Der/NomAg+N+Err/Orth:%»ij              flagIJE_ODD        ;
               +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem             flagNomActOdd      ;
                  +Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML          LES_LASSE_ie       ;
                +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»iegået          GÅETEDH            ;
                   +Der1+Der/st+V:%»iest            DÅAJVOEHTIDH       ;
                    +Der1+Der/l+V:%»iel             GOLTELIDH          ;
                  +Der1+Der/htj+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH          ;
                     +Der1+Der/ht:%»ieht            DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV    ;
!                  +Der1+Der/Caus:%»iedeht          ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV     ; !we have -didh + -ehte
                +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj         AHTJE              ;
              +Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^1UMLaldihkie  ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP   ;
               +Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^1UMLaldahk    flagLDAHKE         ;
        +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^1UMLeldh      R                  ;
           +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh      flagFINAL1         ;
  +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^1UMLeld       flagFINAL1         ; !

LEXICON BÅETEDH_NOTVGEN   !!≈ * **@CODE@** row A - Group Ixxf
            +Ind+Prs+Uml:%>%^1UMLa         V-I-PRS-SG         ; ! class I special
                +Ind+Prs:%>ie              VSUF-EVEN-PRS-DUPL ;
         +Ind+Prt+Dial/L:%>iej             VSUF-ODD-PRT       ;
    +Ind+Prt+Uml+Dial/SH:%>%^iUML          VSUF-PRT           ;
   +Ind+Prt+Pl1+Err/Orth:%>ibie            FINAL1       ;
   +Ind+Prt+Pl2+Err/Orth:%>idie            FINAL1       ;
   +Ind+Prt+Du2+Err/Orth:%>idien            FINAL1       ;
! +Imprt:%>              VSUF-EVEN-IMP ;
! Infinite forms
! --------------
                    +Inf:%>edh             FINAL1             ;
                 +ConNeg:%>ieh             FINAL1             ;
! +Act:%>eme           FINAL1 ;
                    +Ger:%>ieminie         FINAL1             ;
            +Ger+Err/Orth:%>eminie          FINAL1             ;
                 +PrsPrc:%>ije             flagFINAL1             ;
! +PrsPrc:%>ijes        FINAL1 ;
             +PrfPrc+Uml:%>%^1UMLeme       FINAL1             ;
! row F trigger for Umlaut Prt
! Derivations
! -----------
         +Der3+Der/NomAg+N:%»iej  flagIJE_ODD            ;
 +Der3+Der/NomAg+N+Err/Orth:%»ij  flagIJE_ODD            ;
        +Der3+Der/NomAct+N:%»iem  flagNomActOdd          ;
           +Der1+Der/les+A:%»%^1UML          LES_LASSE_ie       ;
       +Der3+Der/InchL+V:%»iegået          GÅETEDH            ;
! +Der1+Der/st+V:%»iest DÅAJVOEHTIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/l+V:%»iel GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/htj+V:%»%^htjidhUMLehtj GOLTELIDH ;
! +Der1+Der/ht:%»ieht DÅAJVOEHTIDH_TV ;
! +Der1+Der/Caus:%»iedeht ÅARAJEHTEDH_TV ; !we have -didh + -ehte
       +Der3+Der/ahtje+V:%»iejahtj         AHTJE              ;
! +Der1+Der/ldihkie+A:%»%^1UMLaldihk ie_IE_EVENNOCOMP ;
! +Der1+Der/ldahke+N:%»%^1UMLaldahk flagLDAHKE ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Cmp/SgNom:%»%^1UMLeldh R ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom:%»%^1UMLeldh FINAL1 ;
! +Der1+Der/ldh+N+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:%»%^1UMLeld FINAL1 ; !
